Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1601
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Consumer Protection Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Person shall mean natural persons, corporations, trusts, unincorporated associations, partnerships, and limited liability companies;

(2) Trade and commerce shall mean the sale of assets or services and any commerce directly or indirectly affecting the people of the State of Nebraska; and

(3) Assets shall mean any property, tangible or intangible, real, personal, or mixed, and wherever situated, and any other thing of value.

Laws 1974, LB 1028, § 8;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 378.

The Consumer Protection Act is equitable in nature. State ex rel. Stenberg v. Consumer's Choice Foods, 276 Neb. 481, 755 N.W.2d 583 (2008).